Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF841.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2599HV (1) 91 sb/js H.F. 841 Section 1. Section 483A.8, subsection 7, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 7. The department shall make youth deer hunting licenses 3 available for purchase during the same time period that general 4 deer hunting licenses are available for purchase, including 5 through all established deer hunting seasons. A person who is 6 issued a youth deer hunting license may use the deer hunting 7 license and tag during the season for which the license was 8 issued or in any subsequent established deer hunting season 9 using the a method of take authorized by rule for each that 10 season being hunted . If the tag is filled during one of the 11 seasons, the license will not be valid in subsequent seasons. 12